src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!  ---------------
!! The dictionary marks v.n. and v.a. Here, we add _ot and _et for the two infinitives.

LEXICON Neg
+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg1:ib # ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg2:ih # ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg3:i # ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Du1:ähn # ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Du2:epen # ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Du3:äpah # ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl1:epe # ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl2:epet # ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl3:äh # ;

+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg1:idtjib # ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg2:idtjih # ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg3:idtji # ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Du1:eimen # ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Du2:eiten # ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Du3:eika # ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl1:eime # ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl2:eite # ;
+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl3:idtjin # ;

+V+Neg+Imprt+Sg1:elom # ;
+V+Neg+Imprt+Sg2:ele # ;
+V+Neg+Imprt+Sg2:ale # ;
+V+Neg+Imprt+Sg3:ellus # ;
+V+Neg+Imprt+Sg3:ällus # ;
+V+Neg+Imprt+Du1:ällon # ;
+V+Neg+Imprt+Du2:älloten # ;
+V+Neg+Imprt+Du3:älluskan # ;
+V+Neg+Imprt+Pl1:ällob # ;
+V+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:elet # ;
+V+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:alet # ;
+V+Neg+Imprt+Pl3:ällus # ;

LEXICON vn_ot
+V: va_ot ; ! TODO: find difference between v.n. and v.a.

LEXICON vn_et
+V: va_et ; ! TODO: find difference between v.n. and v.a.

LEXICON va_ot
+Inf:%>ot    #   ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>ob   #   ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>oh   #   ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>o    #   ;
+Ind+Prs+Du1:%>on  #   ;
+Ind+Prs+Du2:%>obeten  #   ;
+Ind+Prs+Du3:%>oba #   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>oba  #   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>obete  #   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>obet  #   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>oh  #   ;

LEXICON va_et
+Inf:%>et    #   ;
+ConNeg:%>e # ;
+PrsPrc:%>eje # ;
+PrfPrc:%>am # ;

+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>ab   #   ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>ah   #   ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>a    #   ;
+Ind+Prs+Du1:%>en  #   ;
+Ind+Prs+Du2:%>ebeten  #   ;
+Ind+Prs+Du3:%>eba #   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>eba  #   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>ebete  #   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>ebet  #   ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>eh  #   ;

+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>ib   #   ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>ih   #   ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>ai    #   ;
+Ind+Prt+Du1:%>aimen  #   ;
+Ind+Prt+Du2:%>aiten  #   ;
+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>aika #   ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>aime  #   ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>aite  #   ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>in  #   ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
